Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2346
Metropolitan utilities district funds; depositories; duty to keep list of securities.

A metropolitan utilities district shall at all times maintain a certified list of the securities furnished by any depository. Each depository shall supply directly to the governing body of the district a sworn monthly statement of the funds of the district on deposit in such depository. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1933, c. 95, § 2, p. 378;

Laws 1935, c. 6, § 1, p. 69;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2531;

R.S.1943, § 77-2346;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 58;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 41;

Laws 2001, LB 177, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 57.